Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 9. Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act.

§ 9.1-900.
Purpose of the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry.

The purpose of the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry (Registry) shall be to assist the efforts of law-enforcement agencies and others to protect their communities and families from repeat offenders and to protect children from becoming victims of criminal offenders by helping to prevent such individuals from being allowed to work directly with children.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2020, c. 829.

Cross references.

As to effect of registration as sex offender on participation in the address confidentiality program for victims of domestic violence, see §

2.2-515.2

. As to exclusions under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act for records of the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry, see §

2.2-3706

. As to personal information systems that are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

. As to offense of providing false information or failing to provide registration information, see §

18.2-472.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2003.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “sex” preceding “offenders.”

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For comment, “Sex Offender Registration and Community Notification Laws: Will These Laws Survive?,” see
37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1245 (2003).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1602. Checklist for Name Change; No. 5-1603. Petition to Change Name; No. 5-1607. Order Changing Name.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Incest, § 2.

§ 9.1-901.
Persons for whom registration required.

Every person convicted on or after July 1, 1994, including a juvenile tried and convicted in the circuit court pursuant to § 16.1-269.1, whether sentenced as an adult or juvenile, of an offense set forth in §

9.1-902

and every juvenile found delinquent of an offense for which registration is required under subsection C of §

9.1-902

shall register, reregister, and verify his registration information as required by this chapter. Every person serving a sentence of confinement on or after July 1, 1994, for a conviction of an offense set forth in § 9.1-902 shall register, reregister, and verify his registration information as required by this chapter. Every person under community supervision as defined by §

53.1-1

or any similar form of supervision under the laws of the United States or any political subdivision thereof, on or after July 1, 1994, resulting from a conviction of an offense set forth in § 9.1-902 shall register, reregister, and verify his registration information as required by this chapter.

Every person found not guilty by reason of insanity on or after July 1, 2007, of an offense set forth in §

9.1-902

shall register, reregister, and verify his registration information as required by this chapter. Every person in the custody of the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, or on conditional release on or after July 1, 2007, because of a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense set forth in §

9.1-902

shall register, reregister, and verify his registration information as required by this chapter.

Unless a specific effective date is otherwise provided, all provisions of the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act shall apply retroactively. This subsection is declaratory of existing law.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 586; 2007, cc. 718, 744; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 586 rewrote subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 718 substituted “subsection G” for “subsection C” in the first sentence of subsection A; and in subsection B [now C], in the first sentence, substituted “Unless a specific effective date is otherwise provided, all” for “All” and deleted “except as provided under subsection C of §

9.1-902

” at the end.

The 2007 amendment by c. 744 added subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection G,” deleted “and” preceding “reregister,” inserted “and verify his registration information” following “reregister,” three times in subsection A; deleted “and” preceding “reregister,” inserted “and verify his registration information” following “reregister,” twice in subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 2004-2005, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 197 (2005).

§ 9.1-902.
Offenses requiring registration.

For purposes of this chapter:“Murder” means a violation of, attempted violation of, or conspiracy to violate §

18.2-31

or

18.2-32

where the victim is (i) under 15 years of age or (ii) where the victim is at least 15 years of age but under 18 years of age and the murder is related to an offense listed in this section or a violation of former § 18.1-21 where the victim is (a) under 15 years of age or (b) at least 15 years of age but under 18 years of age and the murder is related to an offense listed in this section.“Offense for which registration is required” includes:

Any Tier I, Tier II, or Tier III offense;

Murder;

Any offense similar to a Tier I, Tier II, or Tier III offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof; and

Any offense for which registration in a sex offender and crimes against minors registry is required under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted.“Tier I offense” means (i) any homicide in conjunction with a violation of, attempted violation of, or conspiracy to violate clause (i) of §

18.2-371

or §

18.2-371.1

, when the offenses arise out of the same incident, or (ii) any violation of, attempted violation of, or conspiracy to violate:

If the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2016, any violation of §

18.2-356

punishable as a Class 3 felony or any violation of §

18.2-357

punishable as a Class 3 felony.

If the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2019, any felony violation of §

18.2-348

or

18.2-349

.“Tier II offense” means any violation of, attempted violation of, or conspiracy to violate §

18.2-64.1

, subsection C of §

18.2-374.1:1

, or subsection C, D, or E of §

18.2-374.3

.“Tier III offense” means a violation of, attempted violation of, or conspiracy to violate:

“Tier I offense” as defined in this section, “Tier II offense” as defined in this section, “Tier III offense” as defined in this section, and “murder” as defined in this section includes any similar offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof.

Any offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof that is similar to (i) any Tier I, II, or III offense or (ii) murder as defined in this section shall require registration and reregistration in accordance with this chapter in a manner consistent with the registration and reregistration obligations imposed by the similar offense listed or defined in this section, unless such offense requires more stringent registration and reregistration obligations under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted. In instances where more stringent registration and reregistration obligations are required under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted, the offender shall register and reregister as required by this chapter in a manner most similar with the registration obligations imposed under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted.
C. 1. Any offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof that is similar to (i) any Tier I, II, or III offense or (ii) murder as defined in this section shall require registration and reregistration in accordance with this chapter in a manner consistent with the registration and reregistration obligations imposed by the similar offense listed or defined in this section, unless such offense requires more stringent registration and reregistration obligations under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted. In instances where more stringent registration and reregistration obligations are required under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted, the offender shall register and reregister as required by this chapter in a manner most similar with the registration obligations imposed under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted.

Any offense for which registration in a sex offender and crimes against minors registry is required under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted shall require registration and reregistration in accordance with this chapter in the manner most similar with the registration and reregistration obligations imposed under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted unless such offense is similar to (i) any Tier I, II, or III offense or (ii) murder as defined in this section and the registration and reregistration obligations imposed by the similar offense listed or defined in this section are more stringent than those registration and reregistration obligations imposed under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted. In instances where the similar offense listed or defined in this section imposes more stringent registration and reregistration obligations, the offender shall register and reregister as required by this chapter in a manner consistent with the registration and reregistration obligations imposed by the similar offense listed or defined in this section.

Juveniles adjudicated delinquent shall not be required to register; however, where the offender is a juvenile over the age of 13 at the time of the offense who is tried as a juvenile and is adjudicated delinquent on or after July 1, 2005, of any offense for which registration is required, the court may, in its discretion and upon motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth, find that the circumstances of the offense require offender registration. In making its determination, the court shall consider all of the following factors that are relevant to the case: (i) the degree to which the delinquent act was committed with the use of force, threat, or intimidation, (ii) the age and maturity of the complaining witness, (iii) the age and maturity of the offender, (iv) the difference in the ages of the complaining witness and the offender, (v) the nature of the relationship between the complaining witness and the offender, (vi) the offender’s prior criminal history, and (vii) any other aggravating or mitigating factors relevant to the case. The attorney for the Commonwealth may file such a motion at any time during which the offender is within the jurisdiction of the court for the offense that is the basis for such motion. Prior to any hearing on such motion, the court shall appoint a qualified and competent attorney-at-law to represent the offender unless an attorney has been retained and appears on behalf of the offender or counsel has already been appointed.

Prior to entering judgment of conviction of an offense for which registration is required if the victim of the offense was a minor, physically helpless, or mentally incapacitated, when the indictment, warrant, or information does not allege that the victim of the offense was a minor, physically helpless, or mentally incapacitated, the court shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence whether the victim of the offense was a minor, physically helpless, or mentally incapacitated, as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, and shall also determine the age of the victim at the time of the offense if it determines the victim to be a minor. When such a determination is required, the court shall advise the defendant of its determination and of the defendant’s right to make a motion to withdraw a plea of guilty or nolo contendere pursuant to §

19.2-296

. If the court grants the defendant’s motion to withdraw his plea of guilty or of nolo contendere, his case shall be heard by another judge, unless the parties agree otherwise. Failure to make such determination or so advise the defendant does not otherwise invalidate the underlying conviction.

1.

§

18.2-63

unless registration is required pursuant to subdivision 1 of the definition of Tier III offense; former §

18.2-67.2:1

; §

18.2-90

with the intent to commit rape; former § 18.1-88 with the intent to commit rape; any former felony violation of §

18.2-346

; any felony violation of §

18.2-346

.01; any violation of subdivision (4) of §

18.2-355

; any violation of subsection C of §

18.2-357.1

; subsection B of §

18.2-374.1:1

; former subsection D of §

18.2-374.1:1

as it was in effect from July 1, 1994, through June 30, 2007; former clause (iv) of subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

as it was in effect on June 30, 2007; subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

; or a third or subsequent conviction of §

18.2-67.4

, §

18.2-67.4

:2, subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

, §

18.2-386.1

, or, if the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2020, §

18.2-386.2

.If the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2006, §

18.2-91

with the intent to commit any felony offense listed in this section; subsection A of § 18.2-374.1:1; or a felony under §

18.2-67.5:1

.

2.

Where the victim is a minor or is physically helpless or mentally incapacitated as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, subsection A of §

18.2-47

, clause (i) of §

18.2-48

, §

18.2-67.4

, subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

, §

18.2-361

, §

18.2-366

, or a felony violation of former § 18.1-191.

3.

§

18.2-370.6

.

4.

If the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2016, and where the perpetrator is 18 years of age or older and the victim is under the age of 13, any violation of §

18.2-51.2

.

1.

Clause (ii) and (iii) of §

18.2-48

, former § 18.1-38 with the intent to defile or, for the purpose of concubinage or prostitution, a felony violation of subdivision (2) or (3) of former § 18.1-39 that involves assisting or aiding in such an abduction, §

18.2-61

, former § 18.1-44 when such act is accomplished against the complaining witness’s will, by force, or through the use of the complaining witness’s mental incapacity or physical helplessness, or if the victim is under 13 years of age, subsection A of §

18.2-63

where the perpetrator is more than five years older than the victim, §

18.2-67.1

, §

18.2-67.2

, §

18.2-67.3

, former § 18.1-215 when the complaining witness is under 13 years of age, §

18.2-67.4

where the perpetrator is 18 years of age or older and the victim is under the age of six, subsections A and B of §

18.2-67.5

, §

18.2-370

, subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of former § 18.1-213, former § 18.1-214, §

18.2-370

.1, or §

18.2-374.1

;

2.

§

18.2-63

, §

18.2-64.1

, former §

18.2-67.2:1

, §

18.2-90

with the intent to commit rape or, where the victim is a minor or is physically helpless or mentally incapacitated as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, subsection A of §

18.2-47

, §

18.2-67.4

, subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

, clause (i) of §

18.2-48

, §

18.2-361

, §

18.2-366

, or subsection C of §

18.2-374.1:1

. An offense listed under this subdivision shall be deemed a Tier III offense only if the person has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any two or more such offenses, provided that person had been at liberty between such convictions or adjudications;

3.

If the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2006, §

18.2-91

with the intent to commit any felony offense listed in this section. An offense listed under this subdivision shall be deemed a Tier III offense only if the person has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any two or more such offenses, provided that the person had been at liberty between such convictions or adjudications; or

4.

Chapter 117 (18 U.S.C. § 2421 et seq.) of Title 18 of the United States Code or sex trafficking (as described in § 1591 of Title 18, U.S.C.).

History.

2003, cc. 584, 732; 2004, cc. 414, 444; 2005, cc. 586, 603, 631; 2006, cc. 857, 875, 914, 931; 2007, cc. 463, 718, 759, 823; 2008, cc. 592, 747, 772, 877; 2010, c. 858; 2012, c. 243; 2013, cc. 750, 781; 2014, cc. 546, 649, 706; 2015, cc. 690, 691; 2016, c. 586; 2019, c. 617; 2020, cc. 389, 826, 829; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

Cross references.

As to notice required by places of confinement upon intake of certain persons, see § 16.1-249.1. As to prohibiting entry onto school property by adults convicted of sexually violent offense, see §

18.2-370.5

. As to offense of providing false information or failing to provide registration information, see §

18.2-472.1

. As to obtaining records concerning electronic communication service or remote computing service, see §

19.2-70.3

. As to required reports to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, see §

19.2-390

. As to prohibition on adoption by violent sex offenders, see §

63.2-1205.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2003, c. 732 amended
§

19.2-298.1

, which was repealed by Acts
2003, c. 584, cl. 2. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts
2003, c. 732. In accordance with c. 732, the amendment, in subdivision A 1, added clause designations (i) and (ii), deleted “or a third or subsequent conviction of” preceding “subsection C of
§

18.2-67.5

,” and added clause (iii).

Acts
2019, c. 617, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2020, c. 389, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 414 and 444 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, substituted “§§

18.2-361

,

18.2-366

, or clause (iv) of subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

” for “§

18.2-361

, or §

18.2-366

.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 586, in subsection A, subdivision 2 of the definition of “Sexually violent offense,” substituted “An offense” for “Conviction of an offense,” inserted “or adjudicated delinquent” and “or adjudications”; added subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 603 added subdivision A 5 in the definition of “Offense for which registration is required”; inserted “§

18.2-67.4

where the perpetrator is 18 years of age or older and the victim is under the age of six” in the definition of “Sexually violent offense” in subsection A; and inserted “and any offense for which registration in a sex offender and crimes against minors registry is required under the laws of the political subdivision where the offender was convicted” in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631, under the definition of “Sexually violent offense,” inserted “former” preceding “§

18.2-67.2:1

” in subdivision 1 under the definition of “Offense for which registration is required” and subdivision b under the definition of “Sexually violent offense”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857, 914 and 931 are identical, and in subsection A, in the definition of “Offense for which registration is required,” added the last paragraph of subdivision A 1, in subdivision A 2, inserted “Clause (iv) of subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

or” at the beginning and deleted “or clause (iv) of subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

” at the end, deleted “pursuant to §

18.2-31

or

18.2-32

where the victim is a minor” at the end of subdivision A 5, added subdivision A 6 and made related changes, added the definition of “Murder,” added subdivision A 3 in the definition of “sexually violent offense” and made related changes; and in subsection B, inserted “(i) any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof, (ii)” and substituted “jurisdiction” for “political subdivision.”

The 2006 amendment by c. 875 added “or a felony violation under §

18.2-67.5:1

committed on or after July 1, 2006” in subdivision 1 of the paragraph defining “Offense for which registration is required” in subsection A.

Subdivision A 1 in the definition of “Offense for which registration is required” is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 463 inserted “18.2-67.4:2” following “(i) §

18.2-67.4

” in subdivision A 1 [now B 1].

The 2007 amendment by c. 718 rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 759 and 823 are identical, and substituted “subsection B or C” for “subsection D” in subdivision A 1 [now B 1]; substituted “A violation of subsection C” for “Clause (iv) of subsection B” in subdivision A 2 [now B 2]; and inserted “subsection C of §

18.2-374.1:1

” in subdivision 2 following “Sexually violent offense.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 592 and 747 are almost identical, and deleted “and” from the end of subdivision A 3, substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of subdivision A 4 and added subdivisions A 5 and A 6; in subdivision B 1, deleted “or” preceding “subsection B or C” and inserted “former subsection D of §

18.2-374.1:1

as it was in effect from July 1, 1994, through June 30, 2007, former clause (iv) of subsection B of §

18.2-374.3

as it was in effect on June 30, 2007, or subsection C of §

18.2-374.3

” near the middle; substituted “Where the victim” for “Subsection C of §

18.2-374.3

or where the victim” at the beginning of subdivison B 2; and substituted “ ‘Any offense listed in subsection B,’ ‘criminal homicide’ as defined in this section, ‘murder’ as defined in this section, and ‘sexually violent offense’ as defined in this section” for “ ‘Offense for which registration is required’ ” at the beginning of subsection F.

The 2008 amendment by c. 772 inserted subdivision B 3.

The 2008 amendment by c. 877, in subdivision B 1, inserted “unless registration is required pursuant to Subsection E.1,” following “§

18.2-63

,” substituted “subsection B, C, or D of §

18.2-374.3

” for “subsection C of §

18.2-374.3

” near the middle; deleted clauses “(ii)” and “(iii)” in the second paragraph of subdivision B 1; in subdivision B 2, substituted “Where the” for “Subsection C of §

18.2-374.3

or where the” and deleted clause “or (iii);” in subdivision E 1, inserted “and (iii)” following “(ii),” and inserted “subsection A of §

18.2-63

where the perpetrator is more than five years older than the victim” following “§

18.2-61

;” deleted “or (iii)” in subdivision E 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 858 added subsection H.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 243 added the last two sentences in subsection G.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 750 and 781 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “former § 18.1-88 with the intent to commit rape” in subdivision B 1; substituted “§

18.2-361

, §

18.2-366

, or a felony violation of former § 18.1-191” for “§

18.2-361

, or

18.2-366

” at the end of subdivision B 2; added “or a violation of former § 18.1-21 where the victim is (a) under 15 years of age or (b) at least 15 years of age but under 18 years of age and the murder is related to an offense listed in this section” at the end of subsection D; and in subdivision E 1, inserted references to former §§ 18.1-38, 18.1-39, 18.1-44, 18.1-215, 18.1-213 and 18.1-214.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 546 in subsection H inserted “when the indictment, warrant, or information does not allege that the victim of the offense was a minor, physically helpless, or mentally incapacitated” in the first sentence, substituted “When such a determination is required” for “Upon such a determination” and inserted “to make a motion” and “pursuant to §

19.2-296

” in the second sentence, substituted, “court grants the defendant’s motion” for “defendant chooses,” in the fourth sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 649 and 706 are identical and, in subdivision B 1, inserted “any felony violation of §

18.2-346

; any violation of subdivision (4) of §

18.2-355

” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 690 and 691 are identical, and, in subdivision 1 added, “any violation of subsection C of §

18.2-357.1

,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 586 added subdivisions B 4 and B 5.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 617 added subdivision B 6; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 389, in subsection B 1, added “or if the offense was committed on or after July 1, 2020, §

18.2-386.2

” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 826 rewrote former subsection F (now C), which read “F. ‘Any offense listed in subsection B,’ ‘criminal homicide’ as defined in this section, ‘murder’ as defined in this section, and ‘sexually violent offense’ as defined in this section includes (i) any similar offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof or (ii) any offense for which registration in a sex offender and crimes against minors registry is required under the laws of the jurisdiction where the offender was convicted.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 rewrote former subsections A through F as subsections A and B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision 1 of the definition for “Tier I offense,” inserted “any former felony violation of §

18.2-346

” and substituted “§

18.2-346.01

” for “§

18.2-346

.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 2004-2005, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 197 (2005).

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 2007-2008, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149 (2008).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2532. Order of Remand — Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry.